third_party/liblouis/src/tests/tables/suggestChunks.ctb
include ../../tables/de-eurobrl6u.dis
include ../../tables/de-chardefs6.cti

nocross always foo 124-136
nocross always bar 12-1235

# German grade 1 rules
nocross always    au      16         1
nocross always    eu      126        2
nocross always    ei      146        3
nocross always    ch      1456       4
nocross always    sch     156        5
nocross always    st      23456      ]
nocross always    äu      34         \ 
nocross always    ie      346        0

# Some German grade 2 rules

prfword           or      135-1235   OR
nocross always    or      26         ?
word              mal     134-1-123  MAL
nocross always    mal     134        M
prfword           al      1-123      AL
nocross always    al      25         :
prfword           all     1-12345    AQ
nocross always    all     1          A
sufword           ll      123-123    LL
nocross always    ll      12345      Q
begword           lich    123-3456   L#
nocross always    lich    456        _
nocross always    ich     3456       #
word              ch      6-1456     '4
nocross always    ch      1456       4
always            q       6-12345    'Q
nocross always    el      13456      Y
